Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4103.01
Qualified employee leasing company; employees; duty.

An employee of a qualified employee leasing company shall be considered to be an employee of the client-lessee for purposes of the Employment and Investment Growth Act if the employee performs services for the client-lessee. A qualified employee leasing company shall provide the Department of Revenue access to the records of employees leased to the client-lessee.

Laws 1999, LB 539, § 6.